Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-1212
Bridges; condemnation; award; payment; vesting of title.

If a proposition is carried pursuant to section 14-1211, or if the city council of a city of the metropolitan class determines to dispense with such election, title to the property to be appropriated shall at once vest in such city, and the right to possession shall vest in such city as soon as money in the amount of such award is on deposit with the county judge.

Laws 1929, c. 176, § 7, p. 616;

C.S.1929, § 14-1207;

Laws 1935, c. 28, § 2, p. 126;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 14-1207;

R.S.1943, § 14-1212;

Laws 1961, c. 370, § 1, p. 1144;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 247.
July 21, 2022